Utah statutes.
78A-2-212.   Days on which court closed -- Exceptions.

Judicial business on Sunday, on any day on which general election is held, or on any legal holiday, is limited to the following purposes:

(1)  to give, upon their request, instructions to a jury when deliberating on their verdict;

(2)  to receive a verdict or discharge a jury;

(3)  for the exercise of the powers of a magistrate in a criminal action, or in a proceeding of a criminal nature; and

(4)  judicial business not involving a trial or hearing unless the judge finds it necessary for the fair administration of justice.

